North Carolina statutes. Chapter 53. Regulation of Financial Services.
Article 1. Definitions. [Repealed]

§ 53-1.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2012-56, s. 1, effective October 1, 2012.

History.

1921, c. 4, s. 1; C.S. s. 216(a); 1927, c. 47, s. 1; 1931, c. 243, s. 5; 1945, c. 743, s. 1; 1967, c. 789, s. 21; 1979, c. 483, s. 2; 1983, c. 214, s. 1; 1985, c. 677, s. 3; 1989, c. 187, s. 1; 1995, c. 129, s. 1; 2001-263, s. 6; repealed by 2012-56, s. 1, effective October 1, 2012.